Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1317
Dispute; production of documents and records; depositions.

At all times after receipt of the notice of the dispute, each party shall make available to the other, for inspection and copying, all documents, data, and records with respect to the dispute for the presentation of the matter to the arbitration board. If the parties fail to agree on the production of documents and records, the arbitration board shall determine the matter. The parties may also take depositions with respect to the dispute.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 17.